Utah statutes.
10-8-34.   Change of grade and crossings -- Nonuser as grounds for removal.

They may provide for or change the location, grade or crossing of any railroad; and declare a nuisance and take up and remove, or cause to be taken up and removed, the tracks of any railroad or street railway company which shall have been laid upon the streets of the city and which such railway company has failed to operate with cars for public use for a period of nine months after the laying thereof.

